New Jersey, session 222, A436.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Every manufacturer of vehicles sold within this State, individually or as part of a group, shall stamp or engrave the vehicle identification number onto each catalytic converter installed in each motor vehicle sold within the State. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month after the date of enactment. STATEMENT According to the National Insurance Crime Bureau, theft of catalytic converters has dramatically increased in recent years.  In 2019, approximately 3,400 claims of catalytic converter theft were filed.  In 2020, the number of claims more than tripled. Under this bill, car manufacturers would be required to engrave or stamp the vehicle identification number onto the catalytic converter of a motor vehicle sold within the State. It is the sponsors belief that this bill is necessary given the increasing number of thefts, and that once scrap yards and would-be thieves become aware of the new requirements, thefts will decrease.